District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.72

Salary and Assignment for appointment of Metropolitan Police Department at Class 1 — Private.

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, the Mayor, or the Mayor’s designee, may appoint a lateral law enforcement officer to the Metropolitan Police Department without regard to any time in grade or prior department service or incumbency requirements. A lateral law enforcement officer appointed by the Mayor, or by the Mayor’s designee, shall be appointed as a Class 1—Private with compensation at the appropriate rate for this classification, and shall be assigned to duty as prescribed by the Mayor, or by the Mayor’s designee.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1072
as added Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 102(b), 47 DCR 4619

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-610.73, § 1-610.74, § 1-610.75, § 1-610.76, § 5-541.01, § 5-542.02, § 5-543.01, § 5-543.02, § 5-543.03, § 5-543.04, § 5-543.05, § 5-544.01, and § 5-704.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-611.72.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-305, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2701).